Maryland, session 2025, SB0565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–205.1.
(c) (1) If a person is involved in a motor vehicle accident that results in the
death of, or a life threatening injury to, another person [and the person is detained by a
police officer who has reasonable grounds to believe that the person has been driving or
attempting to drive while under the influence of alcohol, while impaired by alcohol, while
so far impaired by any drug, any combination of drugs, or a combination of one or more
drugs and alcohol that the person could not drive a vehicle safely, while impaired by a
controlled dangerous substance, or in violation of § 16–813 of this title], the person shall be
required to submit, as directed by [the] A POLICE officer, to a test of:
(i) The person’s breath to determine alcohol concentration; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0565*

SENATE BILL 565
(ii) One specimen of the person’s blood, to determine alcohol
concentration or to determine the drug or controlled dangerous substance content of the
person’s blood[; or
(iii) Both the person’s breath under item (i) of this paragraph and one
specimen of the person’s blood under item (ii) of this paragraph].
(2) If a police officer directs that a person be tested, then the provisions of
§ 10–304 of the Courts and Judicial Proceedings Article shall apply.
(3) Any medical personnel who perform any test required by this section
are not liable for any civil damages as the result of any act or omission related to such test,
not amounting to gross negligence.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.